North Carolina, session 2025, HB797.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 93A-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93A-2. Definitions and exceptions.
(a) A real estate broker within the meaning of this Chapter is any person, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, association, or other business entity who for a
compensation or valuable consideration or promise thereof lists or offers to list, sells or offers to
sell, buys or offers to buy, auctions or offers to auction (specifically not including a mere crier
of sales), or negotiates the purchase or sale or exchange of real estate, or who leases or offers to
lease, or who sells or offers to sell leases of whatever character, or rents or offers to rent any real
estate or the improvement thereon, for others. A real estate broker within the meaning of this
Chapter also includes any person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company,
association, or other business entity who engages in residential property wholesaling or related
transactions.
…
(a3) "Residential property wholesaling or related transactions" means any of the following
acts:
(1) Soliciting a homeowner to enter into a purchase contract for the sale of the
homeowner's residential property, unless the residential property will be used
as the residence of the soliciting party.
(2) Marketing, assigning, or selling a purchase contract for residential property or
the equitable interest in the residential property to another, for a fee or other
valuable consideration.
(3) Selling or offering to sell, buying or offering to buy, negotiating, or otherwise
dealing in contracts for residential property or the equitable interest in
residential property, or options on residential property or improvements
thereon.
(a4) For purposes of this Chapter, "homeowner" means the record owner or owners or
equitable owner or owners of a residential property.
*H797-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a5) For purposes of this Chapter, "residential property" means real property containing
one or more dwelling units legally used or held out for individuals to live in, regardless of whether
such property is occupied by the owners of said property, rented, or vacant.
(a6) For purposes of this Chapter, "soliciting" means to communicate with a homeowner
through mail, telephone, in-person oral communication, or electronic communication for the
purpose of offering to enter into a purchase contract for the homeowner's residential property.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) Chapter 93A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 8.
"Residential Property Wholesaling and We Buy Houses Homeowner Protection Act.
"§ 93A-89.1. Purposes.
This Article is intended to protect homeowners from the unfair and deceptive practices
involved in residential property wholesaling and related transactions, in which homeowners are
not provided with accurate information regarding the fair market value of their homes or the
monetary incentives of the person or entity soliciting them to sign a purchase contract.
"§ 93A-89.2. Right to cancel residential property wholesaling and related transactions.
(a) A homeowner who is party to a residential property wholesaling or related
transaction, as defined in G.S. 93A-2(a3), shall have the right to cancel the purchase contract
until midnight of the thirtieth day after the date when the homeowner executed the contract or
until conveyance of the deed or title, whichever occurs first. The right to cancel the purchase
contract shall not be waivable.
(b) Notice of cancelation shall be given by certified return receipt mail or by any other
bona fide means of delivery, including electronic delivery or personal delivery, provided that the
homeowner obtains a receipt. A notice of cancelation given by a bona fide means of delivery
shall be effective on the date postmarked, the date of electronic transmission, or on the date of
deposit of the notice with any bona fide means of delivery.
(c) Within 10 business days after the receipt of the notice of cancelation, all payments of
any kind made by the homeowner shall be refunded to the homeowner and an acknowledgment
that the purchase contract is void shall be sent by the broker or salesperson to the homeowner. In
the event of a cancelation under this section, any earnest money paid to the homeowner shall
remain the property of the homeowner.
(d) A homeowner who exercises the right of cancelation shall not be liable for any
damages as a result of the exercise of that right.
(e) The purchase contract used by a person or entity engaging in a residential property
wholesaling or related transaction, as defined in G.S. 93A-2(a3), shall include the following
information in at least 14-point font, immediately above the homeowner's signature:
(1) A statement that the homeowner has the right to cancel the purchase contract
until midnight of the thirtieth day after the date when the homeowner executed
the contract or until conveyance of the deed or title, whichever occurs first, by
certified return receipt mail or by any other bona fide means of delivery,
including electronic delivery or personal delivery, provided that the
homeowner obtains a receipt.
(2) The mailing address, electronic mail address, and physical address where the
homeowner can cause a notice of cancelation to be delivered.
(3) A statement that within 10 business days after the receipt of a notice of
cancelation, all payments of any kind made by the homeowner shall be
refunded to the homeowner, and the homeowner shall not be liable for any
damages as a result of exercising the right to cancel.
Page 2 House Bill 797-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) The wholesaler shall provide the homeowner with an exact copy of the contract,
containing all of the disclosures required by subsection (e) of this section, at the time the
homeowner signs the contract.
"§ 93A-89.3. Unfair or deceptive acts.
Failure of an entity engaging in residential property wholesaling or related transactions to
provide homeowners with the right to cancel, as set forth in G.S. 93A-89.2, or engaging in
violations of G.S. 93A-6(a) constitutes per se unfair or deceptive trade practices under
G.S. 75-1.1. Any party aggrieved by this failure to provide the requisite right to cancel or by the
violations of G.S. 93A-6(a) may bring a cause of action and is entitled to the relief available in
Chapter 75 of the General Statutes. Any recoveries available under Chapter 75 of the General
Statutes will not be offset by any consideration paid to the homeowner in connection with the
unfair residential property wholesaling or related transaction. The Attorney General is hereby
empowered to enforce this section as allowed by Chapter 75 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2. Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Real Estate Commission may adopt
rules to implement the provisions of Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and
applies to purchase contracts entered into on or after that date.
House Bill 797-First Edition Page 3